Hawaii statutes.
[§587D-7] Status of child. For
purposes of proceedings under this chapter and adoption proceedings, a newborn
child left at a hospital, fire station, or police station, or with emergency
services personnel under section 587D‑2 shall be considered an abandoned
child. [L Sp 2007, c 7, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next